Hawaii statutes.
§89-5.1 Hearing notice. Notwithstanding
section 91-9.5, in any hearing conducted by the board, all parties shall be
given written notice of the hearing by first class mail or by electronic
service through a company designated by the board at least fifteen days before
the scheduled date of the hearing. [L 2013, c 98, §1; am L 2014, c 8, §2]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next